ru: Тип кассетного адаптера: 3,5 мм на кассету; Bluetooth на кассету; USB на кассету; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta adaptera za kazetu: 3,5 mm na kasetu; Bluetooth na kasetu; USB na kasetu; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de adaptador de cassete: 3,5 mm para cassete; Bluetooth para cassete; USB para cassete; Outro
th: ประเภทอะแดปเตอร์เทปคาสเซ็ท: เชื่อม 3.5 มม. กับคาสเซ็ท; เชื่อมบลูทูธกับคาสเซ็ท; เชื่อม USB กับคาสเซ็ท; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος προσαρμογέα κασέτας: 3,5 mm σε κασέτα; Bluetooth σε κασέτα; USB σε κασέτα; Άλλο
nl: Type cassetteadapter: 3,5 mm naar cassette; Bluetooth naar cassette; USB naar cassette; Andere
es: Tipo de adaptador de casete: 3,5 mm a casete; Bluetooth a casete; USB a casete; Otros
pl: Typ adaptera kasetowego: 3,5 mm do kasety; Bluetooth do kasety; USB do kasety; Inne
ko: 카세트 어댑터 유형: 3.5mm - 카세트; 블루투스 - 카세트; USB - 카세트; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de adaptador de cassete: 3,5 mm para cassete; Bluetooth para cassete; USB para cassete; Outro
sl-SI: Kasetni adapter: 3,5 mm na kaseto; Bluetooth na kaseto; USB na kaseto; Drugo
sv: Kassettadaptertyp: 3,5 mm till kassett; Bluetooth till kassett; USB till kassett; Övrigt
fi: Kasettisovitintyyppi: 3,5 mm:stä kasettiin; Bluetoothista kasettiin; USB:stä kasettiin; Muu
zh-TW: 卡式磁帶轉接器類型: 3.5 毫米卡帶機; 藍牙卡帶機; USB 卡帶機; 其他
nb: Kassettadaptertype: 3,5 mm til kassett; Bluetooth til kassett; USB til kassett; Annet
de: Kassettenadaptertyp: 3,5 mm zu Kassette; Bluetooth zu Kassette; USB zu Kassette; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 盒式适配器类型: 3.5mm 插孔转磁带; 蓝牙转磁带; USB 转磁带; 其他
bg-BG: Тип касетен адаптер: 3,5 mm към касета; Bluetooth към касета; USB към касета; Други
cs: Typ kazetového adaptéru: 3,5 mm na kazetu; Bluetooth na kazetu; USB na kazetu; Jiné
vi: Loại bộ chuyển đổi băng cát-xét: 3,5 mm vào băng cassette; Bluetooth sang băng cassette; USB sang băng cassette; Khác
ja: カセットアダプターの種類: 3.5mm-カセット; Bluetooth-カセット; USB-カセット; その他
da: Kassetteadaptertype: 3,5 mm til kassette; Bluetooth til kassette; USB til kassette; Andet
it: Tipo di adattatore per cassetta: 3,5 mm a cassetta; Bluetooth a cassetta; USB a cassetta; Altro
ro-RO: Tip adaptor casetă: 3,5 mm la casetă; Bluetooth la casetă; USB la casetă; Altele
tr: Kaset adaptör tipi: 3,5 mm'den kasete; Bluetooth'tan kasete; USB'den kasete; Diğer
hu: Kazettaadapter típusa: 3,5 mm-es csatlakozó és kazettás lejátszó; Bluetooth és kazettás lejátszó; USB és kazettás lejátszó; Egyéb
lt-LT: Kasetės adapterio tipas: 3,5 mm į kasetę; „Bluetooth“ į kasetę; USB į kasetę; Kita
fr: Type d’adaptateur de cassette: 3,5 mm vers cassette; Bluetooth vers cassette; USB vers cassette; Autre
sk-SK: Typ kazetového adaptéra: 3,5 mm na kazetu; Bluetooth na kazetu; USB na kazetu; Iné
en: Cassette adapter type: 3.5mm to cassette; Bluetooth to cassette; USB to cassette; Other